Utah statutes.
76-8-417.   Tampering with official notice or proclamation.

Every person who intentionally defaces, obliterates, tears down, or destroys any copy or transcript or extract from or of any law of the United States or of this state, or any proclamation, advertisement, or notice, set up at any place in this state by authority of any law of the United States or of this state, or by order of any court or of any public officer, before the expiration of the time for which the same was to remain set up, is guilty of an infraction.

